Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2701.56
Buyer-based exemption, defined.

Buyer-based exemption means an exemption based on who purchases the product. An exemption that is available to all individuals shall not be considered a buyer-based exemption.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 62.